Arkansas, session 2025, HB1185.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF ARKANSAS:

SECTION 1. Arkansas Code Title 17, Chapter 83, is amended to add an
additional subchapter to read as follows:
Subchapter 4 — Dietitian Licensure Compact

17-83-401. Text of compact.
The Dietitian Licensure Compact is enacted into law and entered into by
this state with all states legally joining therein and in the form
substantially as follows:

DIETITIAN LICENSURE COMPACT

SECTION 1: PURPOSE
The purpose of this Compact is to facilitate interstate Practice of Dietetics
with the goal of improving public access to dietetics services. This Compact
preserves the regulatory authority of States to protect public health and
safety through the current system of State licensure, while also providing
for licensure portability through a Compact Privilege granted to qualifying
professionals.
*JMB029*
02-27-2025 10:52:30 JMB029

As Engrossed: H2/13/25 H2/26/25 H2/27/25 HB1185
This Compact is designed to achieve the following objectives:
A. Increase public access to dietetics services;
B. Provide opportunities for interstate practice by Licensed
Dietitians who meet uniform requirements;
C. Eliminate the necessity for Licenses in multiple States;
D. Reduce administrative burden on Member States and Licensees;
E. Enhance the States’ ability to protect the public’s health and
safety;
F. Encourage the cooperation of Member States in regulating multistate
practice of Licensed Dietitians;
G. Support relocating Active Military Members and their spouses;
H. Enhance the exchange of licensure, investigative, and disciplinary
information among Member States; and
I. Vest all Member States with the authority to hold a Licensed
Dietitian accountable for meeting all State practice laws in the State in
which the patient is located at the time care is rendered.

SECTION 2. DEFINITIONS
As used in this Compact, and except as otherwise provided, the following
definitions shall apply:
A. “ACEND” means the Accreditation Council for Education in Nutrition
and Dietetics or its successor organization.
B. “Active Military Member” means any individual with full-time duty
status in the active armed forces of the United States, including members of
the National Guard and Reserve.
C. “Adverse Action” means any administrative, civil, equitable or
criminal action permitted by a State’s laws which is imposed by a Licensing
Authority or other authority against a Licensee, including actions against an
individual’s License or Compact Privilege such as revocation, suspension,
probation, monitoring of the Licensee, limitation on the Licensee’s practice,
or any other Encumbrance on licensure affecting a Licensee’s authorization to
practice, including issuance of a cease and desist action.
D. “Alternative Program” means a non-disciplinary monitoring or
practice remediation process approved by a Licensing Authority.
E. “Charter Member State” means any Member State which enacted this
Compact by law before the Effective Date specified in Section 12.
02-27-2025 10:52:30 JMB029

As Engrossed: H2/13/25 H2/26/25 H2/27/25 HB1185
F. “Continuing Education” means a requirement, as a condition of
License renewal, to provide evidence of participation in, and completion of,
educational and professional activities relevant to practice or area of work.
G. “CDR” means the Commission on Dietetic Registration or its
successor organization.
H. “Compact Commission” means the government agency whose membership
consists of all States that have enacted this Compact, which is known as the
Dietitian Licensure Compact Commission, as described in Section 8, and which
shall operate as an instrumentality of the Member States.
I. “Compact Privilege” means a legal authorization, which is
equivalent to a License, permitting the Practice of Dietetics in a Remote
State.
J. “Current Significant Investigative Information” means:
1. Investigative Information that a Licensing Authority, after a
preliminary inquiry that includes notification and an opportunity for the
subject Licensee to respond, if required by State law, has reason to believe
is not groundless and, if proved true, would indicate more than a minor
infraction; or
2. Investigative Information that indicates that the subject
Licensee represents an immediate threat to public health and safety
regardless of whether the subject Licensee has been notified and had an
opportunity to respond.
K. “Data System” means a repository of information about Licensees,
including, but not limited to, Continuing Education, examination, licensure,
investigative, Compact Privilege and Adverse Action information.
L. “Encumbered License” means a License in which an Adverse Action
restricts a Licensee’s ability to practice dietetics.
M. “Encumbrance” means a revocation or suspension of, or any
limitation on a Licensee’s full and unrestricted Practice of Dietetics by a
Licensing Authority.
N. “Executive Committee” means a group of delegates elected or
appointed to act on behalf of, and within the powers granted to them by, this
Compact, and the Compact Commission.
O. “Home State” means the Member State that is the Licensee’s primary
State of residence or that has been designated pursuant to Section 6.
P. “Investigative Information” means information, records, and
02-27-2025 10:52:30 JMB029

As Engrossed: H2/13/25 H2/26/25 H2/27/25 HB1185
documents received or generated by a Licensing Authority pursuant to an
investigation.
Q. “Jurisprudence Requirement” means an assessment of an individual’s
knowledge of the State laws and regulations governing the Practice of
Dietetics in such State.
R. “License” means an authorization from a Member State to either:
1. Engage in the Practice of Dietetics (including medical
nutrition therapy); or
2. Use the title "dietitian,” “licensed dietitian,” “licensed
dietitian nutritionist,” “certified dietitian,” or other title describing a
substantially similar practitioner as the Compact Commission may further
define by Rule.
S. “Licensee” or “Licensed Dietitian” means an individual who
currently holds a License and who meets all of the requirements outlined in
Section 4.
T. “Licensing Authority” means the board or agency of a State, or
equivalent, that is responsible for the licensing and regulation of the
Practice of Dietetics.
U. “Member State” means a State that has enacted the Compact.
V. “Practice of Dietetics” means the synthesis and application of
dietetics, primarily for the provision of nutrition care services, including
medical nutrition therapy, in person or via telehealth, to prevent, manage,
or treat diseases or medical conditions and promote wellness.
W. “Registered Dietitian” means a person who:
1. Has completed applicable education, experience, examination,
and recertification requirements approved by CDR;
2. Is credentialed by CDR as a registered dietitian or a
registered dietitian nutritionist; and
3. Is legally authorized to use the title registered dietitian
or registered dietitian nutritionist and the corresponding abbreviations “RD”
or “RDN.”
X. “Remote State” means a Member State other than the Home State,
where a Licensee is exercising or seeking to exercise a Compact Privilege.
Y. “Rule” means a regulation promulgated by the Compact Commission
that has the force of law.
Z. “Single State License” means a License issued by a Member State
02-27-2025 10:52:30 JMB029

As Engrossed: H2/13/25 H2/26/25 H2/27/25 HB1185
within the issuing State and does not include a Compact Privilege in any
other Member State.
AA. “State” means any state, commonwealth, district, or territory of
the United States of America.
BB. “Unencumbered License” means a License that authorizes a Licensee
to engage in the full and unrestricted Practice of Dietetics.

SECTION 3. STATE PARTICIPATION IN THE COMPACT
A. To participate in the Compact, a State must currently:
1. License and regulate the Practice of Dietetics; and
2. Have a mechanism in place for receiving and investigating
complaints about Licensees.
B. A Member State shall:
1. Participate fully in the Compact Commission’s Data System,
including using the unique identifier as defined in Rules;
2. Notify the Compact Commission, in compliance with the terms
of the Compact and Rules, of any Adverse Action or the availability of
Current Significant Investigative Information regarding a Licensee;
3. Implement or utilize procedures for considering the criminal
history record information of applicants for an initial Compact Privilege.
These procedures shall include the submission of fingerprints or other
biometric-based information by applicants for the purpose of obtaining an
applicant’s criminal history record information from the Federal Bureau of
Investigation and the agency responsible for retaining that State’s criminal
records;
a. A Member State must fully implement a criminal history
record information requirement, within a time frame established by Rule,
which includes receiving the results of the Federal Bureau of Investigation
record search and shall use those results in determining Compact Privilege
eligibility.
b. Communication between a Member State and the Compact
Commission or among Member States regarding the verification of eligibility
for a Compact Privilege shall not include any information received from the
Federal Bureau of Investigation relating to a federal criminal history record
information check performed by a Member State.
4. Comply with and enforce the Rules of the Compact Commission;
02-27-2025 10:52:30 JMB029

As Engrossed: H2/13/25 H2/26/25 H2/27/25 HB1185
5. Require an applicant for a Compact Privilege to obtain or
retain a License in the Licensee’s Home State and meet the Home State’s
qualifications for licensure or renewal of licensure, as well as all other
applicable State laws; and
6. Recognize a Compact Privilege granted to a Licensee who meets
all of the requirements outlined in Section 4 in accordance with the terms of
the Compact and Rules.
C. Member States may set and collect a fee for granting a Compact
Privilege.
D. Individuals not residing in a Member State shall continue to be
able to apply for a Member State’s Single State License as provided under the
laws of each Member State. However, the Single State License granted to these
individuals shall not be recognized as granting a Compact Privilege to engage
in the Practice of Dietetics in any other Member State.
E. Nothing in this Compact shall affect the requirements established
by a Member State for the issuance of a Single State License.
F. At no point shall the Compact Commission have the power to define
the requirements for the issuance of a Single State License to practice
dietetics. The Member States shall retain sole jurisdiction over the
provision of these requirements.

SECTION 4. COMPACT PRIVILEGE
A. To exercise the Compact Privilege under the terms and provisions of
the Compact, the Licensee shall:
1. Satisfy one of the following:
a. Hold a valid current registration that gives the
applicant the right to use the term Registered Dietitian; or
b. Complete all of the following:
i. An education program which is either:
a) A master’s degree or doctoral degree that
is programmatically accredited by (i) ACEND; or (ii) a dietetics accrediting
agency recognized by the United States Department of Education, which the
Compact Commission may by Rule determine, and from a college or university
accredited at the time of graduation by the appropriate regional accrediting
agency recognized by the Council on Higher Education Accreditation and the
United States Department of Education.
02-27-2025 10:52:30 JMB029

As Engrossed: H2/13/25 H2/26/25 H2/27/25 HB1185
b) An academic degree from a college or
university in a foreign country equivalent to the degree described in
subparagraph (a) that is programmatically accredited by (i) ACEND; or (ii) a
dietetics accrediting agency recognized by the United States Department of
Education, which the Compact Commission may by Rule determine.
ii. A planned, documented, supervised practice
experience in dietetics that is programmatically accredited by (i) ACEND, or
(ii) a dietetics accrediting agency recognized by the United States
Department of Education which the Compact Commission may by Rule determine
and which involves at least 1000 hours of practice experience under the
supervision of a Registered Dietitian or a Licensed Dietitian.
iii. Successful completion of either: (i) the
Registration Examination for Dietitians administered by CDR, or (ii) a
national credentialing examination for dietitians approved by the Compact
Commission by Rule; such completion being no more than five years prior to
the date of the Licensee’s application for initial licensure and accompanied
by a period of continuous licensure thereafter, all of which may be further
governed by the Rules of the Compact Commission.
2. Hold an Unencumbered License in the Home State;
3. Notify the Compact Commission that the Licensee is seeking a
Compact Privilege within a Remote State(s);
4. Pay any applicable fees, including any State fee, for the
Compact Privilege;
5. Meet any Jurisprudence Requirements established by the Remote
State(s) in which the Licensee is seeking a Compact Privilege; and
6. Report to the Compact Commission any Adverse Action,
Encumbrance, or restriction on a License taken by any non-Member State within
30 days from the date the action is taken.
B. The Compact Privilege is valid until the expiration date of the
Home State License. To maintain a Compact Privilege, renewal of the Compact
Privilege shall be congruent with the renewal of the Home State License as
the Compact Commission may define by Rule. The Licensee must comply with the
requirements of Section 4(A) to maintain the Compact Privilege in the Remote
State(s).
C. A Licensee exercising a Compact Privilege shall adhere to the laws
and regulations of the Remote State. Licensees shall be responsible for
02-27-2025 10:52:30 JMB029

As Engrossed: H2/13/25 H2/26/25 H2/27/25 HB1185
educating themselves on, and complying with, any and all State laws relating
to the Practice of Dietetics in such Remote State.
D. Notwithstanding anything to the contrary provided in this Compact
or State law, a Licensee exercising a Compact Privilege shall not be required
to complete Continuing Education Requirements required by a Remote State. A
Licensee exercising a Compact Privilege is only required to meet any
Continuing Education Requirements as required by the Home State.

SECTION 5: OBTAINING A NEW HOME STATE LICENSE BASED ON A COMPACT PRIVILEGE
A. A Licensee may hold a Home State License, which allows for a
Compact Privilege in other Member States, in only one Member State at a time.
B. If a Licensee changes Home State by moving between two Member
States:
1. The Licensee shall file an application for obtaining a new
Home State License based on a Compact Privilege, pay all applicable fees, and
notify the current and new Home State in accordance with the Rules of the
Compact Commission.
2. Upon receipt of an application for obtaining a new Home State
License by virtue of a Compact Privilege, the new Home State shall verify
that the Licensee meets the criteria in Section 4 via the Data System, and
require that the Licensee complete the following:
a. Federal Bureau of Investigation fingerprint based
criminal history record information check;
b. Any other criminal history record information required
by the new Home State; and
c. Any Jurisprudence Requirements of the new Home State.
3. The former Home State shall convert the former Home State
License into a Compact Privilege once the new Home State has activated the
new Home State License in accordance with applicable Rules adopted by the
Compact Commission.
4. Notwithstanding any other provision of this Compact, if the
Licensee cannot meet the criteria in Section 4, the new Home State may apply
its requirements for issuing a new Single State License.
5. The Licensee shall pay all applicable fees to the new Home
State in order to be issued a new Home State License.
C. If a Licensee changes their State of residence by moving from a
02-27-2025 10:52:30 JMB029

As Engrossed: H2/13/25 H2/26/25 H2/27/25 HB1185
Member State to a non-Member State, or from a non-Member State to a Member
State, the State criteria shall apply for issuance of a Single State License
in the new State.
D. Nothing in this Compact shall interfere with a Licensee’s ability
to hold a Single State License in multiple States; however, for the purposes
of this Compact, a Licensee shall have only one Home State License.
E. Nothing in this Compact shall affect the requirements established
by a Member State for the issuance of a Single State License.

SECTION 6. ACTIVE MILITARY MEMBERS OR THEIR SPOUSES
An Active Military Member, or their spouse, shall designate a Home State
where the individual has a current License in good standing. The individual
may retain the Home State designation during the period the service member is
on active duty.

SECTION 7. ADVERSE ACTIONS
A. In addition to the other powers conferred by State law, a Remote
State shall have the authority, in accordance with existing State due process
law, to:
1. Take Adverse Action against a Licensee’s Compact Privilege
within that Member State; and
2. Issue subpoenas for both hearings and investigations that
require the attendance and testimony of witnesses as well as the production
of evidence. Subpoenas issued by a Licensing Authority in a Member State for
the attendance and testimony of witnesses or the production of evidence from
another Member State shall be enforced in the latter State by any court of
competent jurisdiction, according to the practice and procedure applicable to
subpoenas issued in proceedings pending before that court. The issuing
authority shall pay any witness fees, travel expenses, mileage, and other
fees required by the service statutes of the State in which the witnesses or
evidence are located.
B. Only the Home State shall have the power to take Adverse Action
against a Licensee’s Home State License.
C. For purposes of taking Adverse Action, the Home State shall give
the same priority and effect to reported conduct received from a Member State
as it would if the conduct had occurred within the Home State. In so doing,
02-27-2025 10:52:30 JMB029

As Engrossed: H2/13/25 H2/26/25 H2/27/25 HB1185
the Home State shall apply its own State laws to determine appropriate
action.
D. The Home State shall complete any pending investigations of a
Licensee who changes Home States during the course of the investigations. The
Home State shall also have authority to take appropriate action(s) and shall
promptly report the conclusions of the investigations to the administrator of
the Data System. The administrator of the Data System shall promptly notify
the new Home State of any Adverse Actions.
E. A Member State, if otherwise permitted by State law, may recover
from the affected Licensee the costs of investigations and dispositions of
cases resulting from any Adverse Action taken against that Licensee.
F. A Member State may take Adverse Action based on the factual
findings of another Remote State, provided that the Member State follows its
own procedures for taking the Adverse Action.
G. Joint Investigations:
1. In addition to the authority granted to a Member State by its
respective State law, any Member State may participate with other Member
States in joint investigations of Licensees.
2. Member States shall share any investigative, litigation, or
compliance materials in furtherance of any joint investigation initiated
under the Compact.
H. If Adverse Action is taken by the Home State against a Licensee’s
Home State License resulting in an Encumbrance on the Home State License, the
Licensee’s Compact Privilege(s) in all other Member States shall be revoked
until all Encumbrances have been removed from the Home State License. All
Home State disciplinary orders that impose Adverse Action against a Licensee
shall include a statement that the Licensee’s Compact Privileges are revoked
in all Member States during the pendency of the order.
I. Once an Encumbered License in the Home State is restored to an
Unencumbered License (as certified by the Home State’s Licensing Authority),
the Licensee must meet the requirements of Section 4(A) and follow the
administrative requirements to reapply to obtain a Compact Privilege in any
Remote State.
J. If a Member State takes Adverse Action, it shall promptly notify
the administrator of the Data System. The administrator of the Data System
shall promptly notify the other Member States State of any Adverse Actions.
02-27-2025 10:52:30 JMB029

As Engrossed: H2/13/25 H2/26/25 H2/27/25 HB1185
K. Nothing in this Compact shall override a Member State’s decision
that participation in an Alternative Program may be used in lieu of Adverse
Action.

SECTION 8. ESTABLISHMENT OF THE DIETITIAN LICENSURE COMPACT COMMISSION
A. The Compact Member States hereby create and establish a joint
government agency whose membership consists of all Member States that have
enacted the Compact known as the Dietitian Licensure Compact Commission. The
Compact Commission is an instrumentality of the Compact States acting jointly
and not an instrumentality of any one State. The Compact Commission shall
come into existence on or after the effective date of the Compact as set
forth in Section 12.
B. Membership, Voting, and Meetings
1. Each Member State shall have and be limited to one (1)
delegate selected by that Member State’s Licensing Authority.
2. The delegate shall be the primary administrator of the
Licensing Authority or their designee.
3. The Compact Commission shall by Rule or bylaw establish a
term of office for delegates and may by Rule or bylaw establish term limits.
4. The Compact Commission may recommend removal or suspension of
any delegate from office.
5. A Member State’s Licensing Authority shall fill any vacancy
of its delegate occurring on the Compact Commission within 60 days of the
vacancy.
6. Each delegate shall be entitled to one vote on all matters
before the Compact Commission requiring a vote by the delegates.
7. Delegates shall meet and vote by such means as set forth in
the bylaws. The bylaws may provide for delegates to meet and vote in-person
or by telecommunication, video conference, or other means of communication.
8. The Compact Commission shall meet at least once during each
calendar year. Additional meetings may be held as set forth in the bylaws.
The Compact Commission may meet in person or by telecommunication, video
conference, or other means of communication.
C. The Compact Commission shall have the following powers:
1. Establish the fiscal year of the Compact Commission;
2. Establish code of conduct and conflict of interest policies;
02-27-2025 10:52:30 JMB029

As Engrossed: H2/13/25 H2/26/25 H2/27/25 HB1185
3. Establish and amend Rules and bylaws;
4. Maintain its financial records in accordance with the bylaws;
5. Meet and take such actions as are consistent with the
provisions of this Compact, the Compact Commission’s Rules, and the bylaws;
6. Initiate and conclude legal proceedings or actions in the
name of the Compact Commission, provided that the standing of any Licensing
Authority to sue or be sued under applicable law shall not be affected;
7. Maintain and certify records and information provided to a
Member State as the authenticated business records of the Compact Commission,
and designate an agent to do so on the Compact Commission’s behalf;
8. Purchase and maintain insurance and bonds;
9. Borrow, accept, or contract for services of personnel,
including, but not limited to, employees of a Member State;
10. Conduct an annual financial review;
11. Hire employees, elect or appoint officers, fix compensation,
define duties, grant such individuals appropriate authority to carry out the
purposes of the Compact, and establish the Compact Commission’s personnel
policies and programs relating to conflicts of interest, qualifications of
personnel, and other related personnel matters;
12. Assess and collect fees;
13. Accept any and all appropriate donations, grants of money,
other sources of revenue, equipment, supplies, materials, services, and
gifts, and receive, utilize, and dispose of the same; provided that at all
times the Compact Commission shall avoid any actual or appearance of
impropriety or conflict of interest;
14. Lease, purchase, retain, own, hold, improve, or use any
property, real, personal, or mixed, or any undivided interest therein;
15. Sell, convey, mortgage, pledge, lease, exchange, abandon, or
otherwise dispose of any property real, personal, or mixed;
16. Establish a budget and make expenditures;
17. Borrow money;
18. Appoint committees, including standing committees, composed
of members, State regulators, State legislators or their representatives, and
consumer representatives, and such other interested persons as may be
designated in this Compact or the bylaws;
19. Provide and receive information from, and cooperate with,
02-27-2025 10:52:30 JMB029

As Engrossed: H2/13/25 H2/26/25 H2/27/25 HB1185
law enforcement agencies;
20. Establish and elect an Executive Committee, including a
chair and a vice chair;
21. Determine whether a State’s adopted language is materially
different from the model compact language such that the State would not
qualify for participation in the Compact; and
22. Perform such other functions as may be necessary or
appropriate to achieve the purposes of this Compact.
D. The Executive Committee
1. The Executive Committee shall have the power to act on behalf
of the Compact Commission according to the terms of this Compact. The powers,
duties, and responsibilities of the Executive Committee shall include:
a. Oversee the day-to-day activities of the administration
of the Compact including enforcement and compliance with the provisions of
the Compact, its Rules and bylaws, and other such duties as deemed necessary;
b. Recommend to the Compact Commission changes to the
Rules or bylaws, changes to this Compact legislation, fees charged to Compact
Member States, fees charged to Licensees, and other fees;
c. Ensure Compact administration services are
appropriately provided, including by contract;
d. Prepare and recommend the budget;
e. Maintain financial records on behalf of the Compact
Commission;
f. Monitor Compact compliance of Member States and provide
compliance reports to the Compact Commission;
g. Establish additional committees as necessary;
h. Exercise the powers and duties of the Compact
Commission during the interim between Compact Commission meetings, except for
adopting or amending Rules, adopting or amending bylaws, and exercising any
other powers and duties expressly reserved to the Compact Commission by Rule
or bylaw; and
i. Other duties as provided in the Rules or bylaws of the
Compact Commission.
2. The Executive Committee shall be composed of nine members:
a. The chair and vice chair of the Compact Commission
shall be voting members of the Executive Committee;
02-27-2025 10:52:30 JMB029

As Engrossed: H2/13/25 H2/26/25 H2/27/25 HB1185
b. Five voting members from the current membership of the
Compact Commission, elected by the Compact Commission;
c. One ex-officio, nonvoting member from a recognized
professional association representing dietitians; and
d. One ex-officio, nonvoting member from a recognized
national credentialing organization for dietitians.
3. The Compact Commission may remove any member of the Executive
Committee as provided in the Compact Commission’s bylaws.
4. The Executive Committee shall meet at least annually.
a. Executive Committee meetings shall be open to the
public, except that the Executive Committee may meet in a closed, non-public
meeting as provided in subsection (F)(2).
b. The Executive Committee shall give 30 days’ notice of
its meetings, posted on the website of the Compact Commission and as
determined to provide notice to persons with an interest in the business of
the Compact Commission.
c. The Executive Committee may hold a special meeting in
accordance with subsection (F)(1)(b).
E. The Compact Commission shall adopt and provide to the Member States
an annual report.
F. Meetings of the Compact Commission
1. All meetings shall be open to the public, except that the
Compact Commission may meet in a closed, non-public meeting as provided in
subsection (F)(2).
a. Public notice for all meetings of the full Compact
Commission shall be given in the same manner as required under the rulemaking
provisions in Section 10, except that the Compact Commission may hold a
special meeting as provided in subsection (F)(1)(b).
b. The Compact Commission may hold a special meeting when
it must meet to conduct emergency business by giving 24 hours’ notice to all
Member States, on the Compact Commission’s website, and other means as
provided in the Compact Commission’s Rules. The Compact Commission’s legal
counsel shall certify that the Compact Commission’s need to meet qualifies as
an emergency.
2. The Compact Commission or the Executive Committee or other
committees of the Compact Commission may convene in a closed, non-public
02-27-2025 10:52:30 JMB029

As Engrossed: H2/13/25 H2/26/25 H2/27/25 HB1185
meeting for the Compact Commission or Executive Committee or other committees
of the Compact Commission to receive legal advice or to discuss:
a. Non-compliance of a Member State with its obligations
under the Compact;
b. The employment, compensation, discipline, or other
matters, practices, or procedures related to specific employees;
c. Current or threatened discipline of a Licensee by the
Compact Commission or by a Member State’s Licensing Authority;
d. Current, threatened, or reasonably anticipated
litigation;
e. Negotiation of contracts for the purchase, lease, or
sale of goods, services, or real estate;
f. Accusing any person of a crime or formally censuring
any person;
g. Trade secrets or commercial or financial information
that is privileged or confidential;
h. Information of a personal nature where disclosure would
constitute a clearly unwarranted invasion of personal privacy;
i. Investigative records compiled for law enforcement
purposes;
j. Information related to any investigative reports
prepared by or on behalf of or for use of the Compact Commission or other
committee charged with responsibility of investigation or determination of
compliance issues pursuant to the Compact;
k. Matters specifically exempted from disclosure by
federal or Member State law; or
l. Other matters as specified in the Rules of the Compact
Commission.
3. If a meeting, or portion of a meeting, is closed, the
presiding officer shall state that the meeting will be closed and reference
each relevant exempting provision, and such reference shall be recorded in
the minutes.
4. The Compact Commission shall keep minutes that fully and
clearly describe all matters discussed in a meeting and shall provide a full
and accurate summary of actions taken, and the reasons therefore, including a
description of the views expressed. All documents considered in connection
02-27-2025 10:52:30 JMB029

As Engrossed: H2/13/25 H2/26/25 H2/27/25 HB1185
with an action shall be identified in such minutes. All minutes and documents
of a closed meeting shall remain under seal, subject to release only by a
majority vote of the Compact Commission or order of a court of competent
jurisdiction.
G. Financing of the Compact Commission
1. The Compact Commission shall pay, or provide for the payment
of, the reasonable expenses of its establishment, organization, and ongoing
activities.
2. The Compact Commission may accept any and all appropriate
revenue sources as provided in subsection (C)(13).
3. The Compact Commission may levy on and collect an annual
assessment from each Member State and impose fees on Licensees of Member
States to whom it grants a Compact Privilege to cover the cost of the
operations and activities of the Compact Commission and its staff, which
must, in a total amount, be sufficient to cover its annual budget as approved
each year for which revenue is not provided by other sources. The aggregate
annual assessment amount for Member States shall be allocated based upon a
formula that the Compact Commission shall promulgate by Rule.
4. The Compact Commission shall not incur obligations of any
kind prior to securing the funds adequate to meet the same; nor shall the
Compact Commission pledge the credit of any of the Member States, except by
and with the authority of the Member State.
5. The Compact Commission shall keep accurate accounts of all
receipts and disbursements. The receipts and disbursements of the Compact
Commission shall be subject to the financial review and accounting procedures
established under its bylaws. However, all receipts and disbursements of
funds handled by the Compact Commission shall be subject to an annual
financial review by a certified or licensed public accountant, and the report
of the financial review shall be included in and become part of the annual
report of the Compact Commission.
H. Qualified Immunity, Defense, and Indemnification
1. The members, officers, executive director, employees and
representatives of the Compact Commission shall be immune from suit and
liability, both personally and in their official capacity, for any claim for
damage to or loss of property or personal injury or other civil liability
caused by or arising out of any actual or alleged act, error, or omission
02-27-2025 10:52:30 JMB029

As Engrossed: H2/13/25 H2/26/25 H2/27/25 HB1185
that occurred, or that the person against whom the claim is made had a
reasonable basis for believing occurred within the scope of Compact
Commission employment, duties, or responsibilities; provided that nothing in
this paragraph shall be construed to protect any such person from suit or
liability for any damage, loss, injury, or liability caused by the
intentional or willful or wanton misconduct of that person. The procurement
of insurance of any type by the Compact Commission shall not in any way
compromise or limit the immunity granted hereunder.
2. The Compact Commission shall defend any member, officer,
executive director, employee, and representative of the Compact Commission
in any civil action seeking to impose liability arising out of any actual or
alleged act, error, or omission that occurred within the scope of Compact
Commission employment, duties, or responsibilities, or as determined by the
Compact Commission that the person against whom the claim is made had a
reasonable basis for believing occurred within the scope of Compact
Commission employment, duties, or responsibilities; provided that nothing
herein shall be construed to prohibit that person from retaining their own
counsel at their own expense; and provided further, that the actual or
alleged act, error, or omission did not result from that person’s intentional
or willful or wanton misconduct.
3. The Compact Commission shall indemnify and hold harmless any
member, officer, executive director, employee, and representative of the
Compact Commission for the amount of any settlement or judgment obtained
against that person arising out of any actual or alleged act, error, or
omission that occurred within the scope of Compact Commission employment,
duties, or responsibilities, or that such person had a reasonable basis for
believing occurred within the scope of Compact Commission employment, duties,
or responsibilities, provided that the actual or alleged act, error, or
omission did not result from the intentional or willful or wanton misconduct
of that person.
4. Nothing herein shall be construed as a limitation on the
liability of any Licensee for professional malpractice or misconduct, which
shall be governed solely by any other applicable State laws.
5. Nothing in this Compact shall be interpreted to waive or
otherwise abrogate a Member State’s state action immunity or state action
affirmative defense with respect to antitrust claims under the Sherman Act,
02-27-2025 10:52:30 JMB029

As Engrossed: H2/13/25 H2/26/25 H2/27/25 HB1185
Clayton Act, or any other State or federal antitrust or anticompetitive law
or regulation.
6. Nothing in this Compact shall be construed to be a waiver of
sovereign immunity by the Member States or by the Compact Commission.

SECTION 9. DATA SYSTEM
A. The Compact Commission shall provide for the development,
maintenance, operation, and utilization of a coordinated Data System.
B. The Compact Commission shall assign each applicant for a Compact
Privilege a unique identifier, as determined by the Rules.
C. Notwithstanding any other provision of State law to the contrary, a
Member State shall submit a uniform data set to the Data System on all
individuals to whom this Compact is applicable as required by the Rules of
the Compact Commission, including:
1. Identifying information;
2. Licensure data;
3. Adverse Actions against a License or Compact Privilege and
information related thereto;
4. Non-confidential information related to Alternative Program
participation, the beginning and ending dates of such participation, and
other information related to such participation not made confidential under
Member State law;
5. Any denial of application for licensure, and the reason(s)
for such denial;
6. The presence of Current Significant Investigative
Information; and
7. Other information that may facilitate the administration of
this Compact or the protection of the public, as determined by the Rules of
the Compact Commission.
D. The records and information provided to a Member State pursuant to
this Compact or through the Data System, when certified by the Compact
Commission or an agent thereof, shall constitute the authenticated business
records of the Compact Commission, and shall be entitled to any associated
hearsay exception in any relevant judicial, quasi-judicial, or administrative
proceedings in a Member State.
E. Current Significant Investigative Information pertaining to a
02-27-2025 10:52:30 JMB029

As Engrossed: H2/13/25 H2/26/25 H2/27/25 HB1185
Licensee in any Member State will only be available to other Member States.
F. It is the responsibility of the Member States to report any Adverse
Action against a Licensee and to monitor the Data System to determine whether
any Adverse Action has been taken against a Licensee. Adverse Action
information pertaining to a Licensee in any Member State will be available to
any other Member State.
G. Member States contributing information to the Data System may
designate information that may not be shared with the public without the
express permission of the contributing State.
H. Any information submitted to the Data System that is subsequently
expunged pursuant to federal law or the laws of the Member State contributing
the information shall be removed from the Data System.

SECTION 10. RULEMAKING
A. The Compact Commission shall promulgate reasonable Rules in order
to effectively and efficiently implement and administer the purposes and
provisions of the Compact. A Rule shall be invalid and have no force or
effect only if a court of competent jurisdiction holds that the Rule is
invalid because the Compact Commission exercised its rulemaking authority in
a manner that is beyond the scope and purposes of the Compact, or the powers
granted hereunder, or based upon another applicable standard of review.
B. The Rules of the Compact Commission shall have the force of law in
each Member State, provided however that where the Rules conflict with the
laws or regulations of a Member State that relate to the procedures, actions,
and processes a Licensed Dietitian is permitted to undertake in that State
and the circumstances under which they may do so, as held by a court of
competent jurisdiction, the Rules of the Compact Commission shall be
ineffective in that State to the extent of the conflict.
C. The Compact Commission shall exercise its rulemaking powers
pursuant to the criteria set forth in this Section and the Rules adopted
thereunder. Rules shall become binding on the day following adoption or as of
the date specified in the Rule or amendment, whichever is later.
D. If a majority of the legislatures of the Member States rejects a
Rule or portion of a Rule, by enactment of a statute or resolution in the
same manner used to adopt the Compact within four (4) years of the date of
adoption of the Rule, then such Rule shall have no further force and effect
02-27-2025 10:52:30 JMB029

As Engrossed: H2/13/25 H2/26/25 H2/27/25 HB1185
in any Member State.
E. Rules shall be adopted at a regular or special meeting of the
Compact Commission.
F. Prior to adoption of a proposed Rule, the Compact Commission shall
hold a public hearing and allow persons to provide oral and written comments,
data, facts, opinions, and arguments.
G. Prior to adoption of a proposed Rule by the Compact Commission, and
at least thirty (30) days in advance of the meeting at which the Compact
Commission will hold a public hearing on the proposed Rule, the Compact
Commission shall provide a Notice of Proposed rulemaking:
1. On the website of the Compact Commission or other publicly
accessible platform;
2. To persons who have requested notice of the Compact
Commission’s notices of proposed rulemaking; and
3. In such other way(s) as the Compact Commission may by Rule
specify.
H. The Notice of Proposed rulemaking shall include:
1. The time, date, and location of the public hearing at which
the Compact Commission will hear public comments on the proposed Rule and, if
different, the time, date, and location of the meeting where the Compact
Commission will consider and vote on the proposed Rule;
2. If the hearing is held via telecommunication, video
conference, or other means of communication, the Compact Commission shall
include the mechanism for access to the hearing in the Notice of Proposed
rulemaking;
3. The text of the proposed Rule and the reason therefore;
4. A request for comments on the proposed Rule from any
interested person; and
5. The manner in which interested persons may submit written
comments.
I. All hearings will be recorded. A copy of the recording and all
written comments and documents received by the Compact Commission in response
to the proposed Rule shall be available to the public.
J. Nothing in this Section shall be construed as requiring a separate
hearing on each Rule. Rules may be grouped for the convenience of the Compact
Commission at hearings required by this Section.
02-27-2025 10:52:30 JMB029

As Engrossed: H2/13/25 H2/26/25 H2/27/25 HB1185
K. The Compact Commission shall, by majority vote of all members, take
final action on the proposed Rule based on the rulemaking record and the full
text of the Rule.
1. The Compact Commission may adopt changes to the proposed Rule
provided the changes do not enlarge the original purpose of the proposed
Rule.
2. The Compact Commission shall provide an explanation of the
reasons for substantive changes made to the proposed Rule as well as reasons
for substantive changes not made that were recommended by commenters.
3. The Compact Commission shall determine a reasonable effective
date for the Rule. Except for an emergency as provided in Section 10(L), the
effective date of the Rule shall be no sooner than 30 days after issuing the
notice that it adopted or amended the Rule.
L. Upon determination that an emergency exists, the Compact Commission
may consider and adopt an emergency Rule with 24 hours’ notice, with
opportunity to comment, provided that the usual rulemaking procedures
provided in the Compact and in this Section shall be retroactively applied to
the Rule as soon as reasonably possible, in no event later than ninety
(90) days after the effective date of the Rule. For the purposes of this
provision, an emergency Rule is one that must be adopted immediately in order
to:
1. Meet an imminent threat to public health, safety, or welfare;
2. Prevent a loss of Compact Commission or Member State funds;
3. Meet a deadline for the promulgation of a Rule that is
established by federal law or rule; or
4. Protect public health and safety.
M. The Compact Commission or an authorized committee of the Compact
Commission may direct revision to a previously adopted Rule for purposes of
correcting typographical errors, errors in format, errors in consistency, or
grammatical errors. Public notice of any revision shall be posted on the
website of the Compact Commission. The revision shall be subject to challenge
by any person for a period of thirty (30) days after posting. The revision
may be challenged only on grounds that the revision results in a material
change to a Rule. A challenge shall be made in writing and delivered to the
Compact Commission prior to the end of the notice period. If no challenge is
made, the revision will take effect without further action. If the revision
02-27-2025 10:52:30 JMB029

As Engrossed: H2/13/25 H2/26/25 H2/27/25 HB1185
is challenged, the revision may not take effect without the approval of the
Compact Commission.
N. No Member State’s rulemaking requirements shall apply under this
Compact.

SECTION 11. OVERSIGHT, DISPUTE RESOLUTION, AND ENFORCEMENT
A. Oversight
1. The executive and judicial branches of State government in
each Member State shall enforce this Compact and take all actions necessary
and appropriate to implement this Compact.
2. Except as otherwise provided in this Compact, venue is proper
and judicial proceedings by or against the Compact Commission shall be
brought solely and exclusively in a court of competent jurisdiction where the
principal office of the Compact Commission is located. The Compact Commission
may waive venue and jurisdictional defenses to the extent it adopts or
consents to participate in alternative dispute resolution proceedings.
Nothing herein shall affect or limit the selection or propriety of venue in
any action against a Licensee for professional malpractice, misconduct, or
any such similar matter.
3. The Compact Commission shall be entitled to receive service
of process in any proceeding regarding the enforcement or interpretation of
the Compact and shall have standing to intervene in such a proceeding for all
purposes. Failure to provide the Compact Commission service of process shall
render a judgment or order void as to the Compact Commission, this Compact,
or promulgated Rules.
B. Default, Technical Assistance, and Termination
1. If the Compact Commission determines that a Member State has
defaulted in the performance of its obligations or responsibilities under
this Compact or the promulgated Rules, the Compact Commission shall provide
written notice to the defaulting State. The notice of default shall describe
the default, the proposed means of curing the default, and any other action
that the Compact Commission may take and shall offer training and specific
technical assistance regarding the default.
2. The Compact Commission shall provide a copy of the notice of
default to the other Member States.
C. If a State in default fails to cure the default, the defaulting
02-27-2025 10:52:30 JMB029

As Engrossed: H2/13/25 H2/26/25 H2/27/25 HB1185
State may be terminated from the Compact upon an affirmative vote of a
majority of the delegates of the Member States, and all rights, privileges,
and benefits conferred on that State by this Compact may be terminated
on the effective date of termination. A cure of the default does not relieve
the offending State of obligations or liabilities incurred during the period
of default.
D. Termination of membership in the Compact shall be imposed only
after all other means of securing compliance have been exhausted. Notice of
intent to suspend or terminate shall be given by the Compact Commission to
the governor, the majority and minority leaders of the defaulting State’s
legislature, the defaulting State’s Licensing Authority, and each of the
Member States’ Licensing Authority.
E. A State that has been terminated is responsible for all
assessments, obligations, and liabilities incurred through the effective date
of termination, including obligations that extend beyond the effective date
of termination.
F. Upon the termination of a State’s membership from this Compact,
that State shall immediately provide notice to all Licensees within that
State of such termination. The terminated State shall continue to recognize
all Compact Privileges granted pursuant to this Compact for a minimum of six
months after the date of said notice of termination.
G. The Compact Commission shall not bear any costs related to a State
that is found to be in default or that has been terminated from the Compact,
unless agreed upon in writing between the Compact Commission and the
defaulting State.
H. The defaulting State may appeal the action of the Compact
Commission by petitioning the U.S. District Court for the District of
Columbia or the federal district where the Compact Commission has its
principal offices. The prevailing party shall be awarded all costs of such
litigation, including reasonable attorney’s fees.
I. Dispute Resolution
1. Upon request by a Member State, the Compact Commission shall
attempt to resolve disputes related to the Compact that arise among Member
States and between Member and non-Member States.
2. The Compact Commission shall promulgate a Rule providing for
both mediation and binding dispute resolution for disputes as appropriate.
02-27-2025 10:52:30 JMB029

As Engrossed: H2/13/25 H2/26/25 H2/27/25 HB1185
J. Enforcement
1. By supermajority vote, the Compact Commission may initiate
legal action against a Member State in default in the United States District
Court for the District of Columbia or the federal district where the Compact
Commission has its principal offices to enforce compliance with the
provisions of the Compact and its promulgated Rules. The relief sought may
include both injunctive relief and damages. In the event judicial enforcement
is necessary, the prevailing party shall be awarded all costs of such
litigation, including reasonable attorney’s fees. The remedies herein shall
not be the exclusive remedies of the Compact Commission. The Compact
Commission may pursue any other remedies available under federal or the
defaulting Member State’s law.
2. A Member State may initiate legal action against the Compact
Commission in the U.S. District Court for the District of Columbia or the
federal district where the Compact Commission has its principal offices to
enforce compliance with the provisions of the Compact and its promulgated
Rules. The relief sought may include both injunctive relief and damages. In
the event judicial enforcement is necessary, the prevailing party shall be
awarded all costs of such litigation, including reasonable attorney’s fees.
3. No party other than a Member State shall enforce this Compact
against the Compact Commission.

SECTION 12. EFFECTIVE DATE, WITHDRAWAL, AND AMENDMENT
A. The Compact shall come into effect on the date on which the Compact
statute is enacted into law in the seventh Member State.
1. On or after the effective date of the Compact, the Compact
Commission shall convene and review the enactment of each of the first seven
Member States (“Charter Member States”) to determine if the statute enacted
by each such Charter Member State is materially different than the model
Compact statute.
a. A Charter Member State whose enactment is found to be
materially different from the model Compact statute shall be entitled to the
default process set forth in Section 11.
b. If any Member State is later found to be in default, or
is terminated, or withdraws from the Compact, the Compact Commission shall
remain in existence and the Compact shall remain in effect even if the number
02-27-2025 10:52:30 JMB029

As Engrossed: H2/13/25 H2/26/25 H2/27/25 HB1185
of Member States should be less than seven.
2. Member States enacting the Compact subsequent to the seven
initial Charter Member States shall be subject to the process set forth in
Section 8(C)(21) to determine if their enactments are materially different
from the model Compact statute and whether they qualify for participation in
the Compact.
3. All actions taken for the benefit of the Compact Commission
or in furtherance of the purposes of the administration of the Compact prior
to the effective date of the Compact or the Compact Commission coming into
existence shall be considered to be actions of the Compact Commission unless
specifically repudiated by the Compact Commission.
4. Any State that joins the Compact subsequent to the Compact
Commission’s initial adoption of the Rules and bylaws shall be subject to the
Rules and bylaws as they exist on the date on which the Compact becomes law
in that State. Any Rule that has been previously adopted by the Compact
Commission shall have the full force and effect of law on the day the Compact
becomes law in that State.
B. Any Member State may withdraw from this Compact by enacting a
statute repealing the same.
1. A Member State’s withdrawal shall not take effect until 180
days after enactment of the repealing statute.
2. Withdrawal shall not affect the continuing requirement of the
withdrawing State’s Licensing Authority to comply with the investigative and
Adverse Action reporting requirements of this Compact prior to the effective
date of withdrawal.
3. Upon the enactment of a statute withdrawing from this
Compact, a State shall immediately provide notice of such withdrawal to all
Licensees within that State. Notwithstanding any subsequent statutory
enactment to the contrary, such withdrawing State shall continue to recognize
all Compact Privileges granted pursuant to this Compact for a minimum of 180
days after the date of such notice of withdrawal.
C. Nothing contained in this Compact shall be construed to invalidate
or prevent any licensure agreement or other cooperative arrangement between a
Member State and a non-Member State that does not conflict with the
provisions of this Compact.
D. This Compact may be amended by the Member States. No amendment to
02-27-2025 10:52:30 JMB029

As Engrossed: H2/13/25 H2/26/25 H2/27/25 HB1185
this Compact shall become effective and binding upon any Member State until
it is enacted into the laws of all Member States.

SECTION 13. CONSTRUCTION AND SEVERABILITY
A. This Compact and the Compact Commission’s rulemaking authority
shall be liberally construed so as to effectuate the purposes and the
implementation and administration of the Compact. Provisions of the Compact
expressly authorizing or requiring the promulgation of Rules shall not be
construed to limit the Compact Commission’s rulemaking authority solely for
those purposes.
B. The provisions of this Compact shall be severable and if any
phrase, clause, sentence, or provision of this Compact is held by a court of
competent jurisdiction to be contrary to the constitution of any Member
State, a State seeking participation in the Compact, or of the United States,
or the applicability thereof to any government, agency, person, or
circumstance is held to be unconstitutional by a court of competent
jurisdiction, the validity of the remainder of this Compact and the
applicability thereof to any other government, agency, person, or
circumstance shall not be affected thereby.
C. Notwithstanding Section 13(B), the Compact Commission may deny a
State’s participation in the Compact or, in accordance with the requirements
of Section 11(B), terminate a Member State’s participation in the Compact, if
it determines that a constitutional requirement of a Member State is a
material departure from the Compact. Otherwise, if this Compact shall be held
to be contrary to the constitution of any Member State, the Compact shall
remain in full force and effect as to the remaining Member States and in full
force and effect as to the Member State affected as to all severable matters.

SECTION 14. CONSISTENT EFFECT AND CONFLICT WITH OTHER STATE LAWS
A. Nothing herein shall prevent or inhibit the enforcement of any
other law of a Member State that is not inconsistent with the Compact.
B. Any laws, statutes, regulations, or other legal requirements in a
Member State in conflict with the Compact are superseded to the extent of the
conflict.
C. All permissible agreements between the Compact Commission and the
Member States are binding in accordance with their terms.
02-27-2025 10:52:30 JMB029

As Engrossed: H2/13/25 H2/26/25 H2/27/25 HB1185

17-83-402. Administration of compact — Rules.
(a) The Arkansas Dietetics Licensing Board is the Dietitian Licensure
Compact administrator for this state.
(b) The board may adopt rules that are consistent with the compact
necessary to implement this subchapter.
(c) The board is not required to adopt the rules of the Dietitian Licensure
Compact Commission for those rules to be effective in this state.
(d) For the purposes of the member state's ability to reject a rule
under Section 10(D) of the Dietitian Licensure Compact, Arkansas delegates
its authority in this provision to the General Assembly or the Legislative
Council.

SECTION 2. Arkansas Code § 17-83-303 is amended to read as follows:
17-83-303. Qualifications for licenses.
(a) The Arkansas Dietetics Licensing Board may issue a license as
licensed dietitian to an applicant who qualifies as follows:
(1) The applicant files an application and has:
(A) Received a baccalaureate or postbaccalaureate degree
from a regionally accredited United States college or university with a
program in human nutrition, food and nutrition, dietetics, or food systems
management. Applicants who have obtained their education outside of the
United States and its territories must have their academic degree or degrees
validated as equivalent to the baccalaureate or postbaccalaureate degree
conferred by a regionally accredited college or university in the United
States;
(B) Completed a planned, continuous preprofessional
experience component in dietetic practice of not fewer than nine hundred
(900) hours under the supervision of a registered dietitian or licensed
dietitian; and
(C) Passed an examination as defined by the board; or
(2) The applicant files an application and provides evidence of
current registration as a registered dietitian by the Commission on Dietetic
Registration.
(b) If the applicant indicates that he or she intends to participate
in the Dietitian Licensure Compact, the applicant shall apply for a criminal
02-27-2025 10:52:30 JMB029

As Engrossed: H2/13/25 H2/26/25 H2/27/25 HB1185
background check and meet the qualifications for issuance of a license under
§ 17-83-309.

SECTION 3. Arkansas Code Title 17, Chapter 83, Subchapter 3, is
amended to add an additional section to read as follows:
17-83-309. Criminal background checks.
(a) Each applicant or licensee for a license issued by the Arkansas
Dietetics Licensing Board under the Dietitian Licensure Compact is required
to apply for a state and national criminal background check, to be conducted
by the Identification Bureau of the Division of Arkansas State Police and the
Federal Bureau of Investigation.
(b) The criminal background check shall conform to the applicable
federal standards and shall include the taking of fingerprints.
(c) The applicant or licensee shall sign a release of information to
the board and shall be responsible for the payment of any fee associated with
the criminal background check.
(d) Upon completion of the criminal background check, the
Identification Bureau of the Division of Arkansas State Police shall forward
to the board all releasable information obtained concerning the applicant or
licensee.
(e) For purposes of this section, the board shall follow the licensing
restrictions based on criminal records under § 17-3-102.
(f)(1) Information received by the board from the Identification
Bureau of the Division of Arkansas State Police under this section shall not
be available for examination except by the affected applicant or licensee for
licensure or his or her authorized representative or the person whose license
is subject to revocation or his or her authorized representative.
(2) A record, file, or document shall not be removed from the
custody of the Division of Arkansas State Police.
(g) Information made available to the affected applicant or licensee
for licensure or the person whose license is subject to revocation shall be
information pertaining to that person only.
(h) Rights of privilege and confidentiality established in this
section do not extend to any document created for purposes other than the
criminal background check under the Dietitian Licensure Compact.
(i) The board shall adopt the necessary rules to fully implement the
02-27-2025 10:52:30 JMB029

As Engrossed: H2/13/25 H2/26/25 H2/27/25 HB1185
provisions of this section.
/s/L. Johnson


































02-27-2025 10:52:30 JMB029